Hawaii, session 2025, HB596.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 127A-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended as follows: 1.  By amending the definition of "disaster" to read: ""Disaster" means [any emergency,] the occurrence or imminent threat [thereof, which results or may likely result in] of widespread or severe damage, injury, or loss of life, property, or environment resulting from any sudden natural or artificial cause, including hurricanes, windstorms, floods, extreme rain events, earthquakes, landslides, mudslides, volcanic activity, tsunamis, fires, explosions, air or water contamination, blight, droughts, infestations, riots, sabotage, hostile military or paramilitary action, disruption of state services, hazardous material accidents, disease or contagion outbreaks, bioterrorism, terrorism, or incidents involving weapons of mass destruction, and requires, or may require, assistance from other counties, states, the federal government, or from private agencies." 2.  By amending the definition of "emergency" to read: ""Emergency" means [any] the occurrence, or imminent threat thereof, [which results or may likely result in substantial injury or] of a disaster that causes or may be likely to cause catastrophic harm and immediate danger to the population [or], substantial damage to or loss of property, or substantial damage to or loss of the environment[.] and that timely action can avert or minimize." SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2050.